Hawaii, session 2025, HB1030.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1. There are appropriated or authorized from the sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining unit (4): FY 2025-2026        FY 2026-2027 General funds                -0-                -0- Special funds                -0-                -0- Federal funds                -0-                -0- Other funds                  -0-                -0- Of the above amounts, the following amounts are for the department of education: FY 2025-2026        FY 2026-2027 General funds                -0-                -0- Special funds                -0-                -0- Federal funds                -0-                -0- Other funds                  -0-                -0- SECTION 2. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for the purposes of this part. PART II SECTION 3.  There are appropriated or authorized from the sources of funding indicated below to administration (JUD 601) the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining unit (4): FY 2025-2026        FY 2026-2027 General funds                -0-                -0- Special funds                -0-                -0- Federal funds                -0-                -0- Other funds                  -0-                -0- SECTION 4. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part shall be expended by the chief justice in the respective fiscal year for the purposes of this part. PART III SECTION 5. There are appropriated or authorized from the sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the salary increases and other cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for state officers and employees who are excluded from collective bargaining and belong to the same compensation plans as those officers and employees within bargaining unit (4): FY 2025-2026        FY 2026-2027 General funds                -0-                -0- Special funds                -0-                -0- Federal funds                -0-                -0- Other funds                  -0-                -0- Of the above amounts, the following amounts are for the department of education: FY 2025-2026        FY 2026-2027 General funds                -0-                -0- Special funds                -0-                -0- Federal funds                -0-                -0- Other funds                  -0-                -0- SECTION 6. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for the purposes of this part. PART IV SECTION 7. There are appropriated or authorized from the sources of funding indicated below to administration (JUD 601) the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the salary increases and other cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, by the chief justice for state officers and employees who are excluded from collective bargaining and belong to the same compensation plans as those officers and employees within bargaining unit (4): FY 2025-2026        FY 2026-2027 General funds                -0-                -0- Special funds                -0-                -0- Federal funds                -0-                -0- Other funds                  -0-                -0- SECTION 8. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part shall be expended by the chief justice in the respective fiscal year for the purposes of this part. Part V SECTION 9. There are authorized from the source of funding indicated below to Hawaii health systems corporation  corporate office (HTH 210) the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining unit (4) who is assigned to the Hawaii health systems corporation: FY 2025-2026        FY 2026-2027 Special funds                -0-                -0- SECTION 10. Funds authorized by this part shall be allotted by the director of finance to the Hawaii health systems corporation for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for the purposes of this part. Part VI SECTION 11. There are authorized from the source of funding indicated below to Hawaii health systems corporation  corporate office (HTH 210) the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the salary increases and other cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for state officers and employees who are excluded from collective bargaining, assigned to the Hawaii health systems corporation, and belong to the same compensation plans as those officers and employees within bargaining unit (4): FY 2025-2026        FY 2026-2027 Special funds                -0-                -0- SECTION 12. Funds authorized by this part shall be allotted by the director of finance to the Hawaii health systems corporation for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for the purposes of this part. Part VII SECTION 13. Salary increases and cost adjustments provided in this Act for any officer or employee whose compensation is paid, in whole or in part, from federal, special, or other funds shall be paid wholly or proportionately, as the case may be, from the respective funds. SECTION 14. Funds appropriated or authorized by this Act that are not expended or encumbered by June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, of the respective fiscal years, shall lapse as of those dates. SECTION 15. In accordance with section 9 of article VII of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii and sections 37-91 and 37-93, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the legislature has determined that the state general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2025-2026 has already been exceeded by $          , or       per cent.  In addition, the appropriations contained in this Act will cause the state general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2025-2026 to be further exceeded by $          , or one per cent. The reasons for exceeding the general fund expenditure ceiling are that the appropriations made in this Act are necessary to serve the public interest and to meet the needs addressed by this Act. SECTION 16. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.